Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 8

Motor Vehicles

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-8-101. Registration of state-owned motor vehicles — Report.

(a)(1)

In order that a complete inventory of all state-owned motor vehicles is maintained, every state agency, including the Arkansas Department of Transportation, the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Arkansas National Guard, and all constitutional offices shall annually register each motor vehicle owned by the State of Arkansas with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner prescribed by the secretary.

(2)

The registration shall include a description of each motor vehicle, including the year, make, model, license number, vehicle identification number, and other information which the secretary might require.

(3)

Whenever any state agency sells or disposes of a motor vehicle, a complete record thereof shall be furnished to the secretary as authorization for the removal of the vehicle from the official state inventory.

(4)

Whenever any state agency acquires a new or additional motor vehicle, the information required by this subsection to be placed in the state inventory shall be furnished to the secretary within ten (10) days after the acquisition of the vehicle by the agency.

(5)

The secretary shall keep the inventory of motor vehicles owned by the State of Arkansas and its agencies current at all times, categorized in accordance with the motor vehicles owned by each of the respective state agencies.

(b)(1)

The secretary shall make an annual report to the Legislative Council as to the number of motor vehicles owned by the State of Arkansas.

(2)

The report shall include a comparison of the current inventory of motor vehicles with an inventory of the preceding year.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 455, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-524, 14-525; Acts 2017, No. 707, §
83; 2019, No. 910, § 3502.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” and “Secretary” for “Director” in (a)(1); and substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout the section.

22-8-102. Leasing and renting of vehicles by state agencies — Definitions.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Lease” means obtaining the use of a motor vehicle from any source for a monetary fee, for a period of thirty-one (31) days or more;

(2)

“Rental” means obtaining the use of a motor vehicle from any source for a monetary fee for a period of thirty (30) days or less; and

(3)

“State agency” means the same as defined in §19-11-203.

(b)(1)

Before any state agency leases any motor vehicle or renews any existing lease for a motor vehicle, the state agency shall submit a written request to the State Procurement Director identifying the motor vehicles sought to be leased by the state agency and all facts and circumstances the director may request to enable him or her to determine the economics, need, and feasibility of leasing the motor vehicle.

(2)

Upon receipt, the director shall review the request to lease the motor vehicle, and if he or she determines that the lease is in the best interest of the State of Arkansas and that the state agency has adequate funds to pay the lease, he or she may approve the request but only if the proposed lease has been reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

(3)

If, after the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee has reviewed the proposed lease of the motor vehicle, the director approves the proposed lease of the motor vehicle, the director shall stamp his or her approval on the request and return it to the state agency, which may proceed to enter into the lease as proposed and approved by the director.

(c)

If the director disapproves a proposed lease of a motor vehicle, he or she shall stamp his or her disapproval on the request and return it to the state agency, and it shall be unlawful for the state agency to proceed to lease the motor vehicle.

(d)

If federal assistance requirements or federal contract requirements conflict with this section, this section shall not prevent a state agency from complying with the terms and conditions of the federal assistance requirements or the federal contract requirements.

(e)

It is a violation of state procurement laws, Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 11, for a state agency official to conduct multiple rentals of a motor vehicle to avoid the approval and review requirements of this section.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 455, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-526; Acts 2001, No. 588, § 1; 2019, No. 417, § 10.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 417, § 11, provided: “Rules.

“(a)

When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the State Procurement Director shall file the final rules with the Secretary of State for adoption under §25-15-204(f):

“(1)

On or before January 1, 2020; or

“(2)

If approval under §10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1, 2020, as soon as practicable after approval under §10-3-309.

“(b)

The director shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative Council under §10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2020, so that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before January 1, 2020”.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment added (a) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “request to the State Procurement Director” for “request therefor to the Director of the Office of State Purchasing of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b)(1); substituted “the director” for “the Director of the Office of State Purchasing of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3); substituted “the director” for “the Director of the Office of Purchasing” in (b)(4) and (c); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2019 amendment added (a)(3); inserted “state” twice in (b)(1) and once in (b)(2); substituted “the proposed lease has been reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee” for “he or she has first received the approval of the Legislative Council” in (b)(2); in (b)(3), substituted “If, after the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee has reviewed the proposed lease of the motor vehicle, the director approves the proposed lease of the motor vehicle” for “After receiving the approval of the Legislative Council”, and deleted “then” following “which may”; deleted (b)(4); added (d) and (e); and made stylistic changes.

22-8-103. Penalty for noncompliance with §§ 22-8-101 and 22-8-102.

Any department head or employee of the State of Arkansas failing or refusing to carry out the provisions of §§22-8-101 and22-8-102 shall be deemed guilty of a Class B misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished in the manner provided by law.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 455, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-527.

Cross References.

Term of imprisonment, §5-4-401(b)(2).

22-8-104. Private use of state or county vehicles — Penalty.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any state or county employee who is employed by the Arkansas Department of Transportation or by a county highway department, county judge, or road commissioner to use trucks and automobiles that belong to the state or county for any purpose other than performing actual service for the state or county.

(b)

The use of publicly owned cars and trucks for individual use to make pleasure trips on Sundays and other holidays, except when going to and from the place of employment or transporting tools, material, and other supplies to places of necessity, is prohibited.

(c)

The provisions of this section shall not be so construed as to prevent judges and road commissioners from making road inspection trips when the judge or road commissioner deems the inspections necessary.

(d)

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Acts 1941, No. 318, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-501, 14-502; Acts 2017, No. 707, §
84.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a).

Cross References.

Funding restrictions for state passenger motor vehicles, §19-4-906.

22-8-105. Global positioning devices on certain state-owned vehicles — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “global positioning device” means a device that can access a global navigation satellite system or that uses radio frequency information technology and provides reliable location and time information and is capable of recording the travel and location of a vehicle.

(b)(1)

A global positioning device may be installed on a state-owned vehicle.

(2)

Each state agency, board, or commission may keep records of its vehicles' travels and locations as recorded by the global positioning device.

(c)(1)

The records kept by a state agency, board, or commission under this section are subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

(2)

However, disclosure shall not be made for the travels or locations of any state-owned vehicle under this section until thirty (30) days have elapsed after the travel or after the state-owned vehicle was at the location.

(d)

The records kept by a state agency, board, or commission under this section are subject to audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit and shall be kept for at least five (5) years.

(e)

Each state agency, board, or commission that uses global positioning devices on its vehicles may promulgate rules for the implementation and administration of this section.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1161, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Automobile and Pickup Truck Acquisition Act for the State of Arkansas

Cross References.

Motor vehicle restrictions, §19-4-906.

Travel regulations, §19-4-901.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 493, § 16: Mar. 17, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly that certain parts of this act are necessary for immediate effectiveness in order to promulgate rules and regulations, to establish procedures for implementing the provisions of this act and to maintain the fiscal integrity of the state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 68, § 33: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1993, No. 108, § 5: Feb. 11, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that authorizing the payment of costs associated with the renovation of State Police motor vehicles from the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund is economically beneficial to the State of Arkansas, and the savings realized from such renovations will allow the Arkansas Department of State Police to replace high mileage and possibly dangerous motor vehicles sooner. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 656, § 10: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that proper and effective management requires that changes to the finance and accounting laws of the state begin on the first day of the fiscal year; that the changes being made are important to the financial well being of the state particularly during the difficult financial climate the state is currently facing; and that this act is immediately necessary to allow for the finance and accounting changes to go into effect on the first day of the fiscal year for the proper and effective management of this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2013, No. 1405, § 3: Apr. 23, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the failure to include provisions for the payment of state and local sales and use taxes in the conditions for appropriation transfers under the Automobile and Pickup Truck Acquisition Act for the State of Arkansas may cause funding shortages and work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential government services or programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-8-201. Title.

This subchapter may be known as the “Automobile and Pickup Truck Acquisition Act for the State of Arkansas”.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 493, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-528.

22-8-202. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to establish procedures for the acquisition, disposal, and reassignment by the Department of Finance and Administration of automobiles and pickup trucks, as defined in §22-8-203, to be acquired, owned, or otherwise disposed of by certain state agencies, boards, commissions, departments, and institutions of higher education.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 493, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-529.

22-8-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Automobile” means a motorized vehicle equipped with pneumatic tires used for the transportation of persons, as commonly known and recognized by the Revenue Division, as a pleasure vehicle for licensing purposes as established by §27-14-601(a)(1);

(2)

“Emergency vehicle” means an automobile or pickup truck used in law enforcement or for protection of the public peace and health of the citizens of Arkansas;

(3)(A)

“Law enforcement agency” means a police force or organization whose primary responsibility as established by statute or ordinance is the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this state.

(B)

“Law enforcement agency” does not include the Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation;

(4)

“Pickup truck” means a motorized vehicle equipped with pneumatic tires which are regularly and commonly rated as having a load capacity not exceeding three-fourths (¾) ton, as recognized by the Revenue Division, for licensing purposes for trucks and trailers as established in §27-14-601(a)(3)(A);

(5)

“State agency” means a state agency, board, commission, department, or institution of higher education which derives any financial support from the fund accounts enumerated in §§19-5-302 —19-5-304,19-5-306,19-5-307,19-5-1011,19-6-404,19-6-411, and25-4-117;

(6)

“State Vehicle Inventory and Control System” means an automated system maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration to record and control the size and composition of the state's vehicle fleet and to accumulate historical data on the costs associated with the vehicle fleet; and

(7)

“Vehicle” or “motor vehicle” means an automobile or pickup truck as defined in this section, unless used out of context in implementing the purposes and intent of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 493, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-530; Acts 2013, No. 311, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
85.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted present (3) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (3)(B).

22-8-204. Applicability.

This subchapter shall not apply to the elected constitutional officers of the state, to the moneys appropriated by the General Assembly for financing the statutory responsibilities of these officers, to the Arkansas Department of Transportation, nor to any local political subdivision.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 493, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-531; Acts 2017, No. 707, §
86.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department”.

22-8-205. Allocation of vehicles — Priority listing.

(a)

Each state agency requesting the acquisition of an automobile or pickup truck shall:

(1)

Have its existing automobiles and pickup trucks included on the state vehicle inventory and control system;

(2)

Not exceed the number of motor vehicles as authorized by law for the agency; and

(3)

Submit a schedule as required for replacing its automobiles or pickup trucks reflecting each vehicle's historical information, the need for replacement, and the disposition of the existing vehicle.

(b)

From the information provided by state agencies requesting the acquisition of automobiles or pickup trucks, the Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare a prioritized ranking for the then-current fiscal year based upon:

(1)

Age of the vehicle to be replaced;

(2)

Actual and projected mileage of the vehicle to be replaced;

(3)

A history of repair costs of the vehicle to be replaced;

(4)

Number and average age of each state agency's fleet of vehicles; and

(5)

Condition of state agency fleet and cost of maintenance of its vehicles.

(c)

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, through the Marketing and Redistribution Section, shall have the authority to reassign a vehicle from a state agency to another state agency based upon need, age, condition, utilization, and justification but not to decrease a state agency's actual number of vehicles owned.

(d)

The secretary shall review the schedule of prioritized ranking for acquiring vehicles, and he or she shall have the authority to make changes, as he or she deems necessary, to the priority listing. He or she shall then forward the priority listing to the Governor for his or her approval or modification.

(e)

Upon securing the Governor's approved priority listing for acquisition of motorized vehicles, the secretary shall then proceed to acquire the vehicles, and he or she shall ensure that the replaced vehicle is transferred to the Marketing and Redistribution Section within thirty (30) days for disposal.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 493, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-532; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3503.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (c), and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (d).

22-8-206. Purchase of automobiles.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall purchase vehicles for state agencies from moneys as appropriated and made available by the General Assembly.

(b)

There is created and established upon the financial records of the Department of Finance and Administration, the Treasurer of State, and the Auditor of State a fund to be known as the “Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund”, which shall be used for the purpose of acquiring motor vehicles as authorized by this subchapter.

(c)(1)

The Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund shall be financed by its proportionate share of moneys made available from:

(A)

The allocation of general revenues as authorized by the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.;

(B)

Moneys made available upon the disposal of used vehicles, which moneys shall be deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund rather than being deposited to the owning state agency's fund;

(C)

Deposits of moneys from benefitting state agencies; and

(D)

Transfers from other State Treasury funds and fund accounts of benefitting state agencies.

(2)

Upon approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the appropriation and funds shall be transferred from the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund to the designated appropriation and fund of the state agency.

(d)(1)

If the secretary determines that a state agency has sufficient funding from sources other than general revenues that may be used to purchase vehicles requested by the state agency, he or she shall transfer on his or her books and on the books of the Auditor of State and the Treasurer of State an amount that is equal to the price of the vehicles and that includes applicable state and local sales and use taxes from the fund from which the funding is available to the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund.

(2)

Upon approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, an amount appropriated to the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be transferred from the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund to the designated appropriation of the state agency.

(3)

If the funds are held in depositories other than the State Treasury, the administrative head of the affected state agency shall issue a check drawn against the funds, which shall be deposited into the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund as a nonrevenue receipt.

(e)

After seeking the advice of the Legislative Council, in order to effectuate the intent and purposes of this subchapter, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall have the authority to transfer:

(1)

Appropriations from the Property Sales Holding Fund to the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund; and

(2)

Appropriations or funds from the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund to the designated state agency appropriation and fund from which the payment for the purchase of vehicles including state and local sales and use taxes is to be made.

(f)

The Department of Human Services is hereby exempt from this section insofar as federal funds and state general revenues necessary to match the federal funds may be transferred to the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund when the director has determined that the Department of Human Services has sufficient funding that may be used to purchase requested vehicles.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 493, §§ 6, 8, 10-12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-533, 14-535, 14-537 — 14-539; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 68, § 23; 2003, No. 656, § 9; 2005, No. 1180, § 1; 2013, No. 1405, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3504.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 508, § 12, provided:

“At least fifty percent (50%) of the general revenues deposited each fiscal year into the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund shall be used for motor vehicle purchases and/or motor vehicle renovation costs for the Department of Arkansas State Police.”

Acts 2015, No. 870, § 16, provided:

“MOTOR VEHICLE ACQUISITION REVOLVING FUND — MOTOR VEHICLE. PURCHASES/RENOVATION. At least fifty percent (50%) of the general revenues and/or general improvement funds deposited into the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund shall be used for motor vehicle purchases and/or motor vehicle renovation costs for the Department of Arkansas State Police.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment added (c)(2); in present (c)(1), added the subdivision designations and made stylistic changes; inserted present (d)(2); redesignated former (d)(2) as (d)(3); and made stylistic changes in (d)(1) and (3).

The 2005 amendment substituted “§22-8-203(4)” for “§22-8-203(3)” in (d)(1); deleted former (e); redesignated former (f) and (g) as present (e) and (f); rewrote present (e)(2); and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendment, in (d)(1), substituted “If” for “In the event that,” and deleted “as defined by §22-8-203(4),” and inserted “state” preceding “agency,” “that is” preceding “equal to the price,” and “and that includes applicable state and local sales and use taxes”; in (d)(2), inserted “an amount appropriated to,” and substituted “under subdivision (d)(1) of this section” for “appropriation”; substituted “If” for “In the event that” in (d)(3); and inserted “including state and local sales and use taxes” in (e)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a).

Cross References.

Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund, §19-5-1002.

Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

22-8-207. Purchase from qualified vendors.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to purchase new or used vehicles from qualified vendors in accordance with the Arkansas Procurement Law, §19-11-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 493, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-536; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3505.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

22-8-208. Vehicle ownership.

Vehicles acquired or assigned under the provisions of this subchapter shall be the property of the state agency to which the vehicle is assigned, and legal title to the vehicle is to rest with the agency.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 493, § 7; A.S.A 1947, § 14-534.

22-8-209. Rules.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, through his or her disbursing officer, is authorized to promulgate such rules as deemed necessary to implement the provisions and intent of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 493, § 13; A.S.A 1947, § 14-540; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2370; 2019, No. 910, § 3506.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading and made a similar change in the section text.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

22-8-210. Motor vehicle renovation.

(a)

Funds deposited into the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund created by §19-5-1002(a) and §22-8-206(b), which may be made available for the purchase of motor vehicles for the Division of Arkansas State Police, may in addition be made available and used for expenses associated with the renovation of state police motor vehicles.

(b)

If the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police determines the cost associated with renovating or repairing state police motor vehicles is economically beneficial, he or she shall contract with a qualified vendor and, when invoiced, shall submit said invoice to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, who shall direct payment from moneys set aside in the fund for the division.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 108, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6025.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a) and (b); and substituted “division” for “department” at the end of (b).

22-8-211. Emergency vehicles — Limited use for out-of-state travel.

(a)

If requested by a law enforcement officer, a law enforcement agency may allow a law enforcement officer employed by the law enforcement agency to use an emergency vehicle owned by the law enforcement agency to travel outside the State of Arkansas for the funeral of a:

(1)

Law enforcement officer;

(2)

Victim of a crime; or

(3)

Witness to a crime.

(b)(1)

If a law enforcement agency approves a law enforcement officer's request under this section to travel to a funeral and the law enforcement agency will pay for the travel with state funds, the law enforcement agency shall consider the cost to the law enforcement agency for travel by:

(A)

Emergency vehicle; and

(B)

Commercial airplane.

(2)

If the law enforcement agency approves the law enforcement officer's request to travel to the funeral, the law enforcement agency shall approve the least costly means of transportation under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 311, § 2.